District of Columbia statutes.
1-612.11

Rules.

The Mayor shall issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of §§ 1-612.04 through 1-612.10. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1211
as added Sept. 11, 1990, D.C. Law 8-155, § 2, 37 DCR 4159
This section is referenced in § 1-612.05, § 1-612.06, and § 1-612.08.
1981 Ed., § 1-613.11.